dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK.dic
acetylcoA/76,37
ADD/75,37
ADHD/75,37
adhd/75,37
adorabel/10,49,77,39
ahashtarit/7,10,39,68
akrostika/74,10,39
alawit/7,10,39,68
alkoholambulatorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
als/75,37
ALS/75,37
ambi/75,37
ambulatorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
AMD/75,37,86
amd/75,86
amfibium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
ammonit/7,10,39,68
anakit/7,10,39,68
analysabel/10,49,77,39
andengradspolynomium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
angelikarødder/74,10,39
ANP/76,37
arbejderbørn/74,10,39,30,29
århundredgammel/10,49,77,39
årsjubilæum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
arvadit/7,10,39,68
asherit/7,10,39,68
auditorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
auspicium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
avvit/7,10,39,68
bagmænd/74,10,39
benjaminit/7,10,39,68
bermudashorts/74,10,39,31
bestiarium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
blodsukre/74,10,39
BNI/75,37
bni/75,37
boligministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
brudenætter/74,10,39
budbringer-RNA/76,37
byplanlaboratorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
bøjlestænger/74,10,39
børnehaveseminarium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
centrallaboratorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
Chagosøer/74,10,39
chloramin-T/76,37
cilium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69 al:cilii al:cilia al:ciliorum
daggammel/10,49,77,39
dametrusser/74,10,39
danit/7,10,39,68
Deauville-kriterium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
demarkationskriterium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
designmuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
det/76
direktorium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
dispergibel/10,49,77,39
djævle/74,10,39,31
DNA/76,37
dna/76,37
dommerkollegium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
dot-com/75,37
dunkel/10,49,77,78,39
dykkerkursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
dæksmænd/74,10,39
EDB/75,37
edb/75,37
ekronit/7,10,39,68
ekspat/75,37 al:ekspats al:ekspats'
emnekursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
endokardium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
energiministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
erhvervsministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
eshtaolit/7,10,39,68
eux/75,37
EUX/75,37
excitabel/10,49,77,39 ph:eksitabel ph:exitabel
expat/75,37 al:expats al:expats'
fagforeningsmænd/74,10,39
fagministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
favorabel/10,49,77,39
ferskvandsakvarium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
filmstudium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
fiskeriterritorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
fleksibel/10,49,77,39
fløjlsbukser/74,10,39
forretningsministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
forstudium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
fosterstadium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
fotolaboratorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
fumlertumlerbørn/74,10,39,30,29
fyrreårsjubilæum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
fødevareministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
gadit/7,10,39,68
gammel/10,49,77,39,31 al:ældre al:ældres al:ældst al:ældste al:ældstes
gatit/7,10,39,68
gershomit/7,10,39,68
GHB/75,37
gibeonit/7,10,39,68
gigtsanatorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
girzit/7,10,39,68
gradsadverbium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
gribekløer/74,10,39
ha-studium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
hamatit/7,10,39,68
handelsgymnasium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
handelskursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
HD-studium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
Hendersonøer/74,10,39
herregårdsmuseum/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,29
hittit/7,10,39,68
hjertedødskriterium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
horonit/7,10,39,68
horribel/10,49,77,39
husit/10,11,2,39,68
højskolekursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
høvl/74,10,39
id/76,37
impermeabel/10,49,77,39
indenrigsministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
indiskutabel/10,49,77,39
industriministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
informationsministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
inkommensurabel/10,49,77,39
inoperabel/10,49,77,39
inspirationskursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
intolerabel/10,49,77,39
IQ/75,37
iq/75,37
irreducibel/10,49,77,39
irreparabel/10,49,77,39
irritabel/10,49,77,39
isotoplaboratorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
jafletit/7,10,39,68
jehielit/7,10,39,68
jerusalemit/7,10,39,68
jitrit/7,10,39,68
juleoratorium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
jurastudium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
kadmonit/7,10,39,68
kapelmusici/74,10,39
kassabel/10,49,77,39
kenit/7,10,39,68
kildestudium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
kinastudium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
kinit/7,10,39,68
klimakterium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
KOL/75,37
kol/75,37
kommissorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
kommunikationsministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
kompendium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
kompressibel/10,49,77,39
konservatorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
konsilium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
kontrollaboratorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
korporligheder/74,10,39
krematorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
krigsministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
kritisabel/10,49,77,39
kvalitetskriterium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
lagermedium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
lampefødder/74,10,39
le'umit/7,10,39,68
lsd/76,37
LSD/76,37
lsd/75,37
LSD/75,37
lysmænd/74,10,39
lærerkollegium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
managementkursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
manassit/7,10,39,68
massemedium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
mdf/76,37
MDF/76,37
MDMA/76,37
mdma/76,37
medicinmænd/74,10,39
mesenterium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69 al:mesenterii al:mesenteria al:mesenteriorum
messenger-RNA/76,37
mikro-RNA/76,37
ministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
miRNA/76,37
MitID/76,37 ph:Mitid
moabit/7,10,39,68
motormænd/74,10,39
mRNA/76,37 ph:mrna
multimedium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
multipel/10,49,77,39
NADPH/76,37
NemID/76,37
nervesanatorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
norman/7,10,39,68
notabel/10,49,77,39
næsedråber/74,10,39
observatorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
OCD/75,37
ocd/75,37
optagelseskriterium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
ovarium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69 al:ovarii al:ovaria al:ovariorum
palpabel/10,49,77,39
parametrium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69 al:parametrii al:parametria al:parametriorum
paramyxovira/74,10,39
perikardium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
plausibel/10,49,77,39
plug-in/76
plug-in/75
plugin/75,37
PMMA/76,37
polynomium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
portrætbøger/74,10,39
postludium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
profitabel/10,49,77,39
præludium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
præsidium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
PTSD/75,37
ptsd/75,37
putit/7,10,39,68
radiomedium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
regeringstalsmænd/74,10,39
rejseimperium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
reklamemedium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
rentabel/10,49,77,39
responsorium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
reversibel/10,49,77,39
RNA/76,37
rna/76,37
rRNA/76,37
rubenit/7,10,39,68
rumlaboratorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
ræer/74,10,39
sanatorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
sejrspodium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
shelanit/7,10,39,68
simpel/10,49,77,78,39
sinit/7,10,39,68
skattepenge/74,10,39,31
småstumper/74,10,39
socialministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
solarium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
spendabel/10,49,77,39
stammødre/74,10,39,31
statsgymnasium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
statsministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
stedsadverbium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
SU/75,37
sukkijit/7,10,39,68
summarium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
sundhedsdata/74,10,39,31
supercilium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69 al:supercilii al:supercilia al:superciliorum
sykursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
syncytium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
teenagerdøtre/74,10,39
terrarium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
territorium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
tidsstudium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
tolerabel/10,49,77,39
transfer-RNA/76,37
transport-RNA/76,37
trommesoli/74,10,39
udenrigsministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
ufavorabel/10,49,77,39
ukontrollabel/10,49,77,39
urfædre/74,10,39,31
URL/76,37
url/76,37
ussel/10,49,77,78,39
valgmandskollegium/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,69
vendelbokursus/34,70,71,10,39,84,85,31
venerabel/10,49,77,39
viscerokranium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
vj/75,37,86 al:vj's al:vj'erne al:vj'ernes al:vj'ene al:vj'enes
VJ/75,37,86 al:VJ's al:VJ'erne al:VJ'ernes al:VJ'ene al:VJ'enes
voksenbøger/74,10,39
webcam/76,37 al:webcams al:webcams' al:webcam'ene al:webcam'enes
zamzummit/7,10,39,68
zuzit/7,10,39,68
ædel/10,49,77,78,39
økonomiministerium/72,71,70,10,34,39,69
ØMU/75,37
